North Carolina, session 2025, HB1203.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115B-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115B-1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Correctional officer. – An employee of an employer who is certified as a State
correctional officer under the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the
General Statutes.
(1a)(2) Employer. – The State of North Carolina and its departments, agencies, and
institutions; or a county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the State.
(3) Experienced correctional officer. – A correctional officer with at least 10 years
of service as a correctional officer in North Carolina.
(2)(4) Firefighter or volunteer firefighter. – The same as provided in G.S. 58-86-25
for "eligible firemen".
(3)(5) Law enforcement officer. – An employee or volunteer of an employer who
possesses the power of arrest, who has taken the law enforcement oath
administered under the authority of the State as prescribed by G.S. 11-11, and
who is certified as a law enforcement officer under the provisions of Article 1
of Chapter 17C of the General Statutes or certified as a deputy sheriff under
the provisions of Chapter 17E of the General Statutes. "Law enforcement
officer" also means the sheriff of the county.
(4)(6) Permanently and totally disabled as a direct result of a traumatic injury
sustained in the line of duty. – A person: (i) who as a law enforcement officer,
correctional officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or rescue squad worker
suffered a disabling injury while in active service or training for active service,
(ii) who at the time of active service or training was a North Carolina resident,
and (iii) who has been determined to be permanently and totally disabled for
compensation purposes by the North Carolina Industrial Commission.
(5)(7) Rescue squad worker. – The same as provided in G.S. 58-86-30 for "eligible
rescue squad worker".
*H1203-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6)(8) Survivor. – Any person whose parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, or
spouse: (i) was a law enforcement officer, a correctional officer, a firefighter,
a volunteer firefighter, or a rescue squad worker, (ii) was killed while in active
service or training for active service or died as a result of a service-connected
disability, and (iii) at the time of active service or training was a North
Carolina resident. The term does not include the widow or widower of a law
enforcement officer, correctional officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or
a rescue squad worker if the widow or widower has remarried.
(7)(9) Tuition. – The amount charged for registering for a credit hour of instruction
and shall not be construed to mean any other fees or charges or costs of
textbooks."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115B-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115B-2. Tuition waiver authorized.
(a) The constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and the community
colleges as defined in G.S. 115D-2(2) shall permit the following persons to attend classes for
credit or noncredit purposes without the required payment of tuition:
(1) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 8.11(a), effective July 1, 2009.
(2) Any person who is the survivor of a law enforcement officer, correctional
officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or rescue squad worker killed as a
direct result of a traumatic injury sustained in the line of duty.
(3) The spouse of a law enforcement officer, correctional officer, firefighter,
volunteer firefighter, or rescue squad worker who is permanently and totally
disabled as a direct result of a traumatic injury sustained in the line of duty.
(4) Any child, if the child is at least 17 years old but not yet 24 years old, whose
parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian is a law enforcement officer,
correctional officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or rescue squad worker
who is permanently and totally disabled as a direct result of a traumatic injury
sustained in the line of duty. However, a child's eligibility for a waiver of
tuition under this Chapter shall not exceed: (i) 54 months, if the child is
seeking a baccalaureate degree, or (ii) if the child is not seeking a
baccalaureate degree, the number of months required to complete the
educational program to which the child is applying.
…
(a1) The community colleges, as defined in G.S. 115D-2(2), shall permit any child, if the
child is at least 17 years old but not yet 24 years old, whose parent, legal guardian, or legal
custodian is a law enforcement officer, experienced correctional officer, or firefighter to attend
classes for credit or noncredit purposes without the required payment of tuition. However, a
child's eligibility for a waiver of tuition under this Chapter shall not exceed the number of months
required to complete the educational program to which the child is applying.
(b) Persons eligible for the tuition waiver under subsection (a) waivers under subsections
(a) and (a1) of this section must meet admission and other standards considered appropriate by
the educational institution. In addition, the constituent institutions of The University of North
Carolina shall accept these persons only on a space available basis."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2026-2027 academic year.
Page 2 House Bill 1203-First Edition